District of Columbia statutes.
1-625.02

Protection of political rights of classroom teachers.

No provision of this subchapter shall be construed to limit the rights of classroom teachers to freely express political opinions.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2513, 25 DCR 5740
renumbered § 2502, Aug. 1, 1979, D.C. Law 3-14, § 2(c), 25 DCR 10565
National Capital Revitalization Corporation, health, life and retirement benefit plans for officers and employees, see § 1-1219.05.
Spouse equity, retirement benefits, see § 1-529.01 et seq.
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-626.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-355.2.